apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
<pardef n="athlé/amh__n">
  <e><p><l>amh-s</l>     <r>amh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>amh</l>       <r>amh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>amhsa</l>     <r>amh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>imh-s</l>     <r>amh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>imh</l>       <r>amh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>imhse</l>     <r>amh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="athobair__n">
  <e><p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>se</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="athphre/ab__n">
  <e><p><l>ab-s</l>      <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ab-s</l>      <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ab</l>        <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ab</l>        <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>aba-s</l>     <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>aba-s</l>     <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>aba</l>       <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>aba</l>       <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abasa</l>     <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abasa</l>     <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absa</l>      <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absa</l>      <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ibe-s</l>     <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ibe</l>       <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ibese</l>     <r>ab<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="athr/iar__n">
  <e><p><l>iar-s</l>     <r>iar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iar</l>       <r>iar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iarsa</l>     <r>iar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éire-s</l>    <r>iar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éire</l>      <r>iar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éirese</l>    <r>iar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="athscinn/eadh__n">
  <e><p><l>eadh-s</l>    <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eadh</l>      <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eadhsa</l>    <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>te-s</l>      <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>te</l>        <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tese</l>      <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí-s</l>      <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí-s</l>      <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí-s</l>      <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí</l>        <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí</l>        <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí</l>        <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tíse</l>      <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tíse</l>      <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tíse</l>      <r>eadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="athshe/inm__n">
  <e><p><l>anma-s</l>    <r>inm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>anma</l>      <r>inm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>anmasa</l>    <r>inm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>inm-s</l>     <r>inm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>inm</l>       <r>inm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>inmse</l>     <r>inm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="athstaidé/ar__n">
  <e><p><l>ar-s</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>arsa</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ir-s</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ir</l>        <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>irse</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="athú/ll__n">
  <e><p><l>ill-s</l>     <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ill</l>       <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>illse</l>     <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ll-s</l>      <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ll-s</l>      <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ll</l>        <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ll</l>        <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lla-s</l>     <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lla-s</l>     <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lla</l>       <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lla</l>       <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>llasa</l>     <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>llasa</l>     <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>llsa</l>      <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>llsa</l>      <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="athléamh"><i>athlé</i><par n="athlé/amh__n"/></e>
<e lm="athobair"><i>athobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="athphreab"><i>athphre</i><par n="athphre/ab__n"/></e>
<e lm="athriar"><i>athr</i><par n="athr/iar__n"/></e>
<e lm="athscinneadh"><i>athscinn</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="athsheinm"><i>athshe</i><par n="athshe/inm__n"/></e>
<e lm="athstaidéar"><i>athstaidé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="athúll"><i>athú</i><par n="athú/ll__n"/></e>
<e lm="baisteadh"><i>baist</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="bithsféar"><i>bithsfé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="cliathobair"><i>cliathobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="clópháipéar"><i>clópháipé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="coinfhéar"><i>coinfhé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="comhobair"><i>comhobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="cruachobair"><i>cruachobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="daorobair"><i>daorobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="dianobair"><i>dianobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="dáileadh"><i>dáil</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="dírléamh"><i>dírlé</i><par n="athlé/amh__n"/></e>
<e lm="fia-úll"><i>fia-ú</i><par n="athú/ll__n"/></e>
<e lm="gaiseadh"><i>gais</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="geamhfhéar"><i>geamhfhé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="gloinepháipéar"><i>gloinepháipé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="gormfhéar"><i>gormfhé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="grafpháipéar"><i>grafpháipé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="gránúll"><i>gránú</i><par n="athú/ll__n"/></e>
<e lm="ianaisféar"><i>ianaisfé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="imcháineadh"><i>imcháin</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="insileadh"><i>insil</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="longbhriseadh"><i>longbhris</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="místaidéar"><i>místaidé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="neamhstaidéar"><i>neamhstaidé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="nuachtpháipéar"><i>nuachtpháipé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="panaicfhéar"><i>panaicfhé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="plánaisféar"><i>plánaisfé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="preab"><i>pre</i><par n="athphre/ab__n"/></e>
<e lm="preasobair"><i>preasobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="próisobair"><i>próisobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="roiseadh"><i>rois</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="rua-úll"><i>rua-ú</i><par n="athú/ll__n"/></e>
<e lm="réamhobair"><i>réamhobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="ríspháipéar"><i>ríspháipé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="sainstaidéar"><i>sainstaidé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="scinneadh"><i>scinn</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="scáineadh"><i>scáin</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="seachobair"><i>seachobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="seascfhéar"><i>seascfhé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="sicfhéar"><i>sicfhé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="spreab"><i>spre</i><par n="athphre/ab__n"/></e>
<e lm="sracobair"><i>sracobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="sraoilleadh"><i>sraoill</i><par n="athscinn/eadh__n"/></e>
<e lm="staidéar"><i>staidé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="stipéar"><i>stipé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="tromobair"><i>tromobair</i><par n="athobair__n"/></e>
<e lm="tromstaidéar"><i>tromstaidé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="trópaisféar"><i>trópaisfé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="áibhéar"><i>áibhé</i><par n="athstaidé/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="úll"><i>ú</i><par n="athú/ll__n"/></e>
